apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="erëmgew/annen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>anne</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onne</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="gew/annen#_erëm__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>anne</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënns</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënnt</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anne</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annt</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anne</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annt</l>      <r>annen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nidder/loossen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>loosse</l>    <r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gelooss</l>   <r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/oossen#_nidder__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>oosse</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éisst</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oosse</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oosst</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oosse</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éiss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éisse</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éisst</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éisse</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ouss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ousse</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ousst</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ousse</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ooss</l>      <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oosst</l>     <r>oossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="no/follegen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>follege</l>   <r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gefolleg</l>  <r>follegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="of/spriechen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>sprieche</l>  <r>spriechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gesprach</l>  <r>spriechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spr/iechen#_of__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ieche</l>     <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>échs</l>      <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>écht</l>      <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieche</l>     <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iecht</l>     <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieche</l>     <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iech</l>      <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iecht</l>     <r>iechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="op/trieden__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>triede</l>    <r>trieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>getruede</l>  <r>trieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tr/ieden#_op__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>iede</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëts</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëtt</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iede</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iede</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="u/bieden__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>biede</l>     <r>bieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gebiet</l>    <r>bieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="u/kucken__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>kucke</l>     <r>kucken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gekuckt</l>   <r>kucken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="u/mellen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>melle</l>     <r>mellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gemellt</l>   <r>mellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="u/nhuelen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>nhuele</l>    <r>nhuelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>geholl</l>    <r>nhuelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="erëmgewannen">    <i>erëmgew</i><par n="erëmgew/annen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="erëmgewannen">    <i>gew</i><par n="gew/annen#_erëm__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="nidderloossen">   <i>nidder</i><par n="nidder/loossen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="nidderloossen">   <i>l</i><par n="l/oossen#_nidder__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="nofollegen">      <i>no</i><par n="no/follegen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ofspriechen">     <i>of</i><par n="of/spriechen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ofspriechen">     <i>spr</i><par n="spr/iechen#_of__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="optrieden">       <i>op</i><par n="op/trieden__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="optrieden">       <i>tr</i><par n="tr/ieden#_op__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ubieden">         <i>u</i><par n="u/bieden__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ukucken">         <i>u</i><par n="u/kucken__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="umellen">         <i>u</i><par n="u/mellen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="unhuelen">        <i>u</i><par n="u/nhuelen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="uspriechen">      <i>u</i><par n="of/spriechen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="uspriechen">      <i>spr</i><par n="spr/iechen#_of__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="zeréckfannen">    <i>f</i><par n="gew/annen#_erëm__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="zouspriechen">    <i>zou</i><par n="of/spriechen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="zouspriechen">    <i>spr</i><par n="spr/iechen#_of__vblex_sep"/></e>
